Wisconsin, session 2025, AB105.
do enact as follows:AB105,1Section 1. 100.76 of the statutes is created to read:100.76 Publishing and distributing certain materials to minors. (1) Definitions. In this section:(a) “Business entity” means a proprietorship, partnership, firm, business trust, joint venture, syndicate, corporation, limited liability company, or business association, including all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of such an organization or entity.(b) “Distribute” means to issue, sell, give, provide, deliver, transfer, transmute, circulate, or disseminate by any means.(c) “Material harmful to minors” means material that is all of the following:1. Material that the average person, applying contemporary community standards and taking the material as a whole and with respect to minors, would find to be designed to appeal or pander to prurient interests.2. Material that exploits, is devoted to, or principally consists of descriptions of actual, simulated, or animated display or depiction of any of the following, in a manner patently offensive with respect to minors:a. Pubic hair, anus, vulva, genitals, or nipple of the female breast.b. Touching, caressing, or fondling of a nipple, breast, buttock, anus, or genitals.c. Sexual intercourse, masturbation, sodomy, bestiality, oral copulation, flagellation, excretory functions, exhibitions, or any other sexual act.3. Material that, when taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value for minors.(d) “Minor” means an individual under 18 years of age.(e) “News-gathering organization employee” means any of the following:1. An employee of a print, online, or mobile platform newspaper, news publication, or news source that provides current news and public interest information, if the employee is acting in his or her capacity as an employee of the newspaper, news publication, or news source.2. An employee of a radio broadcast station, television broadcast station, cable television operator, or wire service, if the employee is acting in his or her capacity as an employee of the radio broadcast station, television broadcast station, cable television operator, or wire service.(f) “Obscene depiction of a purported child” means obscene material, as defined under s. 948.125 (1) (b), that contains a depiction of a purported child, as defined under s. 948.125 (1) (a).(h) “Publish” means to communicate or make information available to another person on a publicly available website.(i) “Reasonable age verification method” means verification by a business entity using any of the following methods to determine that an individual seeking access to material harmful to minors is not a minor:1. A commercial age verification system that verifies age using the individual’s government-issued identification card or by using any commercially reasonable method that uses public or private transactional data gathered about the individual.2. A government-issued digitized identification card.(j) “Substantial portion” means more than one-third of the total material on a website.(2) Age verification required to publish or distribute material harmful to minors. (a) No business entity may knowingly and intentionally publish or distribute material harmful to minors on the Internet from a website that contains a substantial portion of such material, unless the business entity performs reasonable age verification methods to verify the age of individuals attempting to access the website.(b) A person that performs a reasonable age verification method in compliance with par. (a) may not knowingly retain identifying information of the individual attempting to access the website after the individual’s access has been granted or denied.(3) Prohibition on publishing or distributing certain material. No business entity may knowingly and intentionally publish or distribute an obscene depiction of a purported child on the Internet.(4) Civil liability. (a) A person alleging a violation of sub. (2) or (3) may bring an action seeking actual and punitive damages, court costs, and reasonable attorney fees notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1). A person bringing an action under this paragraph is not required to first exhaust any relevant administrative remedies.(b) Sovereign immunity may not be raised as an affirmative defense in an action brought under par. (a).(c) The presence or absence of a criminal conviction related to the same conduct underlying an alleged violation of sub. (2) or (3) has no bearing on the relief available to a person under par. (a).(4m) Enforcement and penalty. (a) The department or the department of justice in consultation with the department may investigate a violation of sub. (2) (b).(b) The department or the department of justice in consultation with the department may commence an action in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of this state to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction a violation of sub. (2) (b). Before entry of final judgment, the court may make any necessary orders to restore to a person any pecuniary loss suffered by the person because of the violation.(c) The department or the department of justice in consultation with the department may commence an action in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of this state to recover a civil forfeiture of not less than $100 and not more than $10,000 for each violation of sub. (2) (b).(5) Exemptions. (a) Subsection (2) does not apply to any bona fide news or public interest broadcast, video, report, or event, and may not be construed to affect the rights of any news-gathering organization employee.(b) No Internet service provider or its affiliates or subsidiaries, virtual private network provider, search engine, or cloud service provider shall be held to have violated sub. (2) on the basis of the entity having provided access or connection to or from a website, content on the Internet, or a facility, system, or network not under that entity’s control, or the entity’s provision of communicating, transmitting, downloading, intermediate storage of, providing access software for, or other services that communicate material harmful to minors, if that entity is not responsible for the creation of the content that constitutes material harmful to minors.(c) No Internet service provider or its affiliates or subsidiaries, virtual private network provider, search engine, or cloud service provider shall be held to have violated sub. (3) on the basis of the entity having provided access or connection to or from a website, content on the Internet, or a facility, system, or network not under that entity’s control, or the entity’s provision of communicating, transmitting, downloading, intermediate storage of, providing access software for, or other services that communicate an obscene depiction of a purported child, if that entity is not responsible for the creation of the content that constitutes an obscene depiction of a purported child. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab105 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab105 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB105 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB105 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB105: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting